Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 5A. Regional Career Technical Center School Districts

§ 1571.
Definitions.

In this subchapter:

“Regional career technical center school district” and “regional CTE center school district” mean a district that maintains a regional career technical center under a governance structure approved by vote of the electorate pursuant to this subchapter.

“School district” means a school district that maintains a high school.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 153, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1572.
Formation of a planning committee.

Any two or more of the following may establish a committee to plan the formation of a regional CTE school district with an alternative governance structure for governance of the regional CTE center: either the school board of a school district that operates a regional CTE center or all the school boards that operate a comprehensive high school that have been designated as the regional CTE center; the majority of the school boards of the other school districts in the CTE center region; or an entity that performs workforce development activities pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 542

in a CTE center region. The planning committee shall consist of representatives of the school district that operates a regional CTE center, the school districts that send students to the regional CTE center, regional employers, and residents of the CTE center region.

The planning committee may determine that no change to the governance structure is needed, or it may prepare a report in the form of an agreement between the school districts that are located in the CTE center region. The report shall describe:

The makeup of the governing board. At least 60 percent of the board members shall be elected by direct vote of the voters or chosen from member school district boards by the member school district boards, or a combination of the two. If the board is to have additional members, who may constitute up to 40 percent of the board, the additional members shall be appointed by the elected and chosen members from member school district boards for the purpose of acquiring expertise in areas they consider desirable. The appointed members may be selected from nominations submitted by the entity that performs workforce development activities pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 542

or other workforce organizations, or may be chosen without nomination by an organization. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a resident of an unorganized town, grant, or gore that sits within the regional CTE center school district who is otherwise eligible to vote under

17 V.S.A. § 2121

may vote for the board members and may be elected to or appointed as a member of the governing board.

[Repealed.]

Proposed bylaws.

A plan for transition from the existing governance structure.

The disposition of the existing CTE center land and facilities.

How existing collective bargaining agreements and employee contracts will be addressed.

Transportation to be provided.

The term of office of the board members and other officers, how other officers are selected, and how board members will be replaced when a vacancy occurs.

The date on which the proposal will be submitted to the voters and whether the votes will be commingled.

A process for amending or dissolving the governance structure.

Any other matter that the committee considers pertinent.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3; amended

2005, No. 32

, § 3;

2005, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 11, 2012;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 154, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1573.
Approval by State Board of Education.

The planning committee shall transmit the report to the Secretary who, after consultation with the chair of the entity that performs workforce development activities pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 542

, shall submit the report with his or her recommendations to the State Board. The State Board, after notice to the planning committee and after giving the committee and other interested parties an opportunity to be heard, shall consider the report and the Secretary’s recommendations and decide whether the establishment of an alternative governance structure will be in the best interests of the students and the region. The State Board may request the Secretary or the planning committee, or both, to make further investigation and may consider any other information deemed by it to be pertinent. If, after due consideration and any further meetings as it may deem necessary, the State Board finds that establishment of the alternative governance structure is in the best interests of the students and the region involved, it shall approve the report submitted by the committee, together with any amendments, as a final report of the planning committee and shall give notice of its action to the committee. The chair of the planning committee shall file a copy of the final report with the clerk of each town school district, incorporated school district, unified union school district, and city school district in the region at least 20 days prior to the vote to adopt the alternative governance structure.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 155, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1574.
Vote to adopt the alternative structure.

Each town school district, incorporated school district, unified union school district, and city school district within the career technical center region shall vote on adoption of the alternative governance structure and formation of a regional career technical center school district. The vote shall be held on the date specified in the final report. The vote shall be by Australian ballot at separate school district meetings held on the same day and during the same hours. The polls shall remain open at least eight hours. Absentee voting as provided by

17 V.S.A. §§ 2531-2550

shall be permitted. Ballots may be commingled. The meetings shall be warned as a special meeting of each school district voting on the proposal.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3.

§ 1575.
Certification.

Within 10 days of any vote held in accordance with this subchapter, the clerks of the participating school districts shall certify the results of the vote to the Secretary of Education, or, if the ballots are to be commingled, each municipal clerk shall appoint a member of the Board of Civil Authority to transport the uncounted ballots to a predetermined location where the appointed members of each participating school district shall count the commingled ballots. If a majority of the voters vote to approve the formation of the governance system and creation of a regional career technical center district, the Secretary shall declare the existing governance structure of the career technical center to be void, the region to be designated a career technical center school district, and the new governance system to be authorized, all as of the date specified in the application, and shall certify the declaration to the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 156, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1576.
Effect of certification; application of other laws.

Upon certification under section 1575 of this title, the career technical center region shall become a public school district and shall constitute a body politic and corporate, with all the rights and responsibilities pertaining to a public school district, as specified in this subchapter, and as specified in the approval granted by the State Board. The career technical center school district shall also be a supervisory district for the purpose of providing the planning and administrative functions of a supervisory union for the programs offered.

The provisions of this subchapter are intended to be in addition to the general provisions of law pertaining to schools and school districts, including any laws relating to school choice, and not a limitation upon them, and, in the event there is no provision in this subchapter to cover a situation and the situation is covered by the general school law or municipal law, the provisions of the general school law or municipal law apply.

A career technical center governed under a structure adopted under this subchapter, except with respect to inconsistent provisions related to methods of governance, shall be subject to all other provisions of this chapter and any other State or federal laws related to the operations of career technical centers and provision of secondary and adult technical education.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 77.

§ 1577.
Duties and authority of Alternative Governance Board.

The governance board of a CTE center authorized under this subchapter, in addition to other duties and authority specifically assigned by law to the governing authority of a CTE center, shall have the following duties and authority:

To determine the educational policies of the career technical center. Policies shall be of general application to the center and shall be in writing, codified, and made available to the public. Board policies shall be adopted at regular or special meetings. A board shall give public notice of its intent to adopt a board policy, stating the substance of the proposed policy, at least ten days prior to its adoption. A board may also approve or disapprove rules and regulations proposed by the director for the conduct and management of the center.

To take any action required for the sound administration of the center. The Secretary of Education, with the advice of the Attorney General, upon application by a board, shall decide whether any action contemplated or taken under this subdivision is required for the sound administration of the center and is consistent with law. The Secretary’s decision shall be final.

To have the possession, care, control, and management of the property of the center, subject to the provisions of any agreement between the former board of the center and the alternative governing board.

To keep the center buildings and grounds in good repair, suitably equipped, insured, and in safe and sanitary condition at all times. The center shall regulate or prohibit firearms or other dangerous or deadly weapons on school premises. A board’s policies in this regard shall be, at minimum, consistent with section 1166 of this title and

13 V.S.A. § 4004

, relating to a student who brings a firearm to or possesses a firearm at school.

To lease or purchase real and personal property, and to sell, relocate, or discontinue use of real and personal property, subject to the terms and conditions of the approval granted to it by the State Board.

To establish and maintain a system for receipt, deposit, disbursement, accounting, control, and reporting procedures that meets the criteria established by the State Board pursuant to subdivision 164(15) of this title and that ensures all payments are lawful and in accordance with the budget adopted pursuant to terms approved by the State Board. The Board may authorize a subcommittee, a superintendent of schools, or a designated employee of the Board to examine claims against the district for center expenses and draw orders for such as shall be allowed by it payable to the party entitled to the payment. Such orders shall state definitely the purpose for which they are drawn and shall serve as full authority to the treasurer to make such payments. It shall be lawful for a board to submit to its treasurer a certified copy of those portions of the board minutes, properly signed by the clerk and chair, or a majority of the board, showing to whom, and for what purpose, each payment is to be made by the treasurer, and the certified copy shall serve as full authority to the treasurer to make the approved payments.

To establish, with the advice and consent of the Auditor of Accounts and the Secretary of Education, a system of accounts for the proper control and reporting of center finances and for stating the annual financial condition of the center.

To sue and be sued.

To execute contracts on behalf of the center, including contracts providing for binding arbitration, by its chair or any person designated whose appointment is recorded in the minutes of the board.

[Repealed.]

To employ persons to carry out the work of the center and dismiss any employee when necessary. The board shall consider the recommendation of the director or superintendent before employing or dismissing any person.

To provide, at the expense of the center, subject to the approval of the director or superintendent, all textbooks, learning materials, equipment, and supplies.

To employ a public accountant every year to audit the financial statements of the regional career technical center school district.

To establish policies and procedures designed to avoid the appearance of board member conflict of interest.

To borrow money by issuance of bonds or notes, not in excess of anticipated revenue for the school year.

To apply for grants and to accept and expend grants and gifts.

To present informational materials, at the expense of the center, to the electorate on any matter to be voted; provided, however, that the materials shall be limited to those that are reasonably designed to inform, educate, and explain to the electorate the board’s position on the matter.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3; amended

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2005, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 157, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 78;

2021, No. 20

, § 61.

§ 1578.
Regional career technical center school district meetings.

The checklist for a regional career technical center school district and records of proceedings shall be made and maintained in the same manner as those functions are carried out in a union school district under sections 706u and 706v of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3.

§ 1578a.
Establishment of a regional career technical center budget.

The board of directors of the regional career technical center school district shall at each annual meeting present an estimate of the expenses for the ensuing year, and the district shall appropriate that sum that it deems necessary for the expenses, together with the amount required to pay any balance left unpaid from the preceding year, expressing the sum in dollars in its vote. If a budget for the operation of the district is not approved, a subsequent meeting or meetings shall be warned.

If a budget has not been approved on or before June 30 of any year, the school board may borrow funds pursuant to the authority granted under section 566 of this title.

Following adoption of a budget, the board shall calculate each member district’s share pursuant to section 1552 of this title. Upon receipt of the notice of the amount, the share shall become a legal obligation of the member district without need for further vote of the member district electorate and shall be included in the member district’s education spending amount.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1579.
Incurring debt.

If authorized by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question in accordance with this section, a regional career technical center school district may incur indebtedness for improvements or the acquisition of capital assets for the purposes for which the district is established as provided in this chapter.

Each town school district, incorporated school district, unified union school district, and city school district within the regional career technical center school district shall vote on a decision to incur indebtedness for improvements as provided by 24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 1. The vote shall be determined by Australian ballot or voting machine on the same day and during the same hours at each regular polling place in each town school district, incorporated school district, unified union school district, and city school district within the regional career technical center school district. Absentee voting in accordance with 17 V.S.A. chapter 51, subchapter 6 shall be permitted. The Board of Civil Authority of each town within the regional career technical center school district shall be responsible for determining the eligibility of persons to vote, the supervision of the election, and the transportation of ballots in its district to a central point designated by the governing board of the regional career technical center school district. The ballots shall be commingled. Counting of ballots by representatives of the Boards of Civil Authority of the towns in the regional career technical center school district shall be supervised by the regional career technical center school district clerk or his or her designee.

Obligations incurred under 24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 1 shall be the joint and several obligations of the regional career technical center school district and of each of the town school districts, incorporated school districts, the member towns of unified union school districts, and city school districts within the career technical center region. Any joint or several liability incurred by a town school district, incorporated school district, the member towns of a unified union school district, or city school district within the career technical center region under the provisions of this subchapter shall not be considered in determining its debt limit for its own separate purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 33

, § 3.